Illinois, session 104th, SB2644.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $20,000,000, or so much thereof as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Illinois Student Assistance Commission for 7awarding of scholaships and administrative costs associated 8with early childhood programs. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.